Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1606
Private, denominational,
or parochial schools; nonconformity with school law; penalty.

In case any private, denominational, or parochial school,
after a final determination by the proper authorities under sections 79-1601
to 79-1607, fails, refuses, or neglects to conform to and comply with such
sections, no person shall be granted or allowed a certificate to teach in
such school and the students attending such school
shall be required to attend the public school of the proper district as provided
by law in like manner as though there were no such private, denominational,
or parochial school. Full credit for certification under the law shall be
given all teachers who have taught in private, denominational, or parochial
schools the same as though they had taught in public schools.

Laws 1919, c. 155, § 7, p. 349;

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 1(n), p. 231;

C.S.1922, § 6508l;

C.S.1929, § 79-1912;

R.S.1943, § 79-1919;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 511, p. 865;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1706;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1009;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 50.

This section did not violate constitutional provision respecting freedom of religion. Meyerkorth v. State, 173 Neb. 889, 115 N.W.2d 585 (1962).